Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4328.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 PART 1 LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the various state departments and agencies, the judicial branch, and the legislative branch described in this part for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025 from the funds indicated in this part. The following is a summary of the appropriations in this part: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 100,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 100,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 100,000,000 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 100,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 100,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 100,000,000 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Storm disaster relief grants $ 75,000,000 Disaster relief contingency supplement 25,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 100,000,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 100,000,000 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2024-2025 GENERAL SECTIONS Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025, total state spending from state sources under part 1 is $100,000,000.00 and state spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $100,000,000.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations made and expenditures authorized under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. If the state administrative board, acting under section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount appropriated under this article, the legislature may, by a concurrent resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and serving in each house, inter-transfer funds for the particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution. DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE Sec. 301. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for storm disaster relief grants must be allocated by the department to counties in areas of this state that have realized a significant financial 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 hardship caused by storm damage. The department shall allocate all funds appropriated for storm disaster relief grants before allocating the funds appropriated for disaster relief contingency supplement. The department shall allocate the funds on a first-come, first-served basis, as follows: (a) After the effective date of this act, 50% of qualified expenses submitted by a county. (b) Six months after the effective date of this act, the remaining 50% of the qualified expenses under subdivision (a). The department shall prorate the remaining available funds, as necessary. (c) After the qualified expenses have been reimbursed under subdivisions (a) and (b), remaining funds must be disbursed under section 302. (2) Funds appropriated in part 1 must be used by counties to assist individual residents, businesses, and communities with identifying and securing disaster assistance. Funding may be used for various purposes, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) State match funding required for receipt and expenditure of any federal funding made available for emergency management assistance. (b) Emergency actions needed to protect life, property, public health, and public safety, including shelter, emergency supplies, and debris clean-up, removal, and disposal. (c) Energy assistance, including paying heating and electricity bills, preventing shutoffs, and providing crisis assistance. (d) Repair or replacement of disaster-damaged public 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 infrastructure, facilities, and businesses. (3) Funds received by an individual under subsection (2) must be used by the individual to cover qualified storm damage related expenses. Funding may be used for various purposes, including, but not limited to, both of the following: (a) Debris clean-up, removal, and disposal. (b) Repair of damages to the individual's dwelling and immediate curtilage. Sec. 302. (1) Funds appropriated under part 1 for disaster relief contingency supplement and any funds that remain after awards have been granted for the purposes specified in section 301 shall be allocated for the following purposes: (a) To fully reimburse expenses submitted by counties that were prorated under section 301(1)(b). (b) To address storm damage on land owned by the state and the department of natural resources. (c) To reimburse an electric cooperative regulated under the electric cooperative member-regulation act, 2008 PA 167, MCL 460.31 to 460.39, for qualified expenses as a result of storm damage. (2) The department shall allocate the funds under subsection (1) on a first-come, first-served basis, as follows: (a) Any remaining qualified expenses submitted by a county that were prorated under section 301(1)(b). (b) After all funds have been disbursed under subdivision (a), 50% of the qualified expenses submitted by the department of natural resources or an electric cooperative under subsection (1). (c) One month after the funds have been disbursed under subdivision (b), the remaining 50% of the qualified expenses submitted under subdivision (b). The department shall prorate the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 remaining available funds, as necessary. Sec. 303. The funds appropriated in part 1 for disaster relief contingency supplement must not be expended until they are transferred to the storm disaster relief grants line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 304. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for storm disaster relief grants and disaster relief contingency supplement are designated as a work project appropriation. Unencumbered or unallotted funds do not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and are available for expenditures under this section until the project has been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to assist individual residents, businesses, and communities of this state with identifying and securing disaster assistance. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees, contracts with vendors, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $100,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2026.